src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! Verbs
! =====

LEXICON V-INIT
+Neg:a%>@P.NeedNeg.ON@ SCPREF ;
SCPREF ;

LEXICON SCPREF
+SC+Sg1+:ngi%> TNS ;
+SC+Pl1+:si%> TNS ;
+SC+Sg2+:u%> TNS ;
+SC+Pl2+:ni%> TNS ;
+SC+CL1+:u%> TNS ;
+SC+CL2+:ba%> TNS ;
+SC+CL1a+:u%> TNS ;
+SC+CL2a+:ba%> TNS ;
+SC+CL3+:u%> TNS ;
+SC+CL4+:i%> TNS ;
+SC+CL5+:li%> TNS ;
+SC+CL6+:a%> TNS ;
+SC+CL7+:si%> TNS ;
+SC+CL8+:zi%> TNS ;
+SC+CL9+:i%> TNS ; 
+SC+CL11+:lu%> TNS ; 
+SC+CL14+:bu%> TNS ; 
+SC+CL15+:ku%> TNS ; 

LEXICON TNS
OCPREF ;
Prs+:ya%> OCPREF ;
Fut+:zo%> OCPREF ;
Fut+:yo%> OCPREF ;
Fut+:zoku%> OCPREF ;

LEXICON OCPREF
VROOT ;
OC+Sg1+:ngi%> VROOT ;
OC+Pl1+:si%> VROOT ;
OC+Sg2+:ku%> VROOT ;
OC+Pl2+:ni%> VROOT ;
OC+CL1+:m%> VROOT ;
OC+CL2+:ba%> VROOT ;
OC+CL1a+:m%> VROOT ;
OC+CL2a+:ba%> VROOT ;
OC+CL3+:wu%> VROOT ;
OC+CL4+:yi%> VROOT ;
OC+CL5+:li%> VROOT ;
OC+CL6+:wa%> VROOT ;
OC+CL7+:si%> VROOT ;
OC+CL8+:zi%> VROOT ;
OC+CL9+:yi%> VROOT ; 
OC+CL11+:lu%> VROOT ; 
OC+CL14+:bu%> VROOT ; 
OC+CL15+:ku%> VROOT ;




LEXICON VSUFF
+V+VFA: ENDLEX ;
+V+VFE:%>^VSUFe ENDLEX ;
+V+Stat:%>^VSUFile ENDLEX ;
+V+Stat:%>^VSUFile ENDLEX ;
 :%>^VSUFi@C.NeedNeg@ ENDLEX ;
 :%>^VSUFanga@C.NeedNeg@ ENDLEX ;

LEXICON ENDLEX
@D.NeedNeg.ON@ # ;
